Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202616-312
Mayor; powers and duties.

(1) The mayor of a city of the first class shall preside at all the meetings of the city council. The mayor may vote on any matter that requires either a majority vote of the city council members or a majority vote of all the elected members of the city council if (a) the mayor's vote is required due to the city council members being equally divided or (b) a majority of the city council members or majority vote of all the elected members cannot be reached due to absence, vacancy, or abstention of one or more city council members. For purposes of such vote, the mayor is deemed to be a member of the city council.

(2) The mayor shall have the superintending control of all the officers and affairs of the city and shall take care that the ordinances of the city and the provisions of law relating to cities of the first class are complied with. The mayor may administer oaths and shall sign the commissions and appointments of all the officers appointed in the city.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 19, p. 234;

R.S.1913, § 4878;

C.S.1922, § 4046;

C.S.1929, § 16-308;

R.S.1943, § 16-312;

Laws 1957, c. 55, § 2, p. 266;

Laws 1980, LB 662, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 790, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 56;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 7;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 5.

When the population of a city of the first class, at the last United States census, drops below the number required for such classification, it becomes a city of the second class and the duties of the mayor are definite and mandatory. State ex rel. Cashman v. Carmean, 138 Neb. 819, 295 N.W. 801 (1941).